North Dakota, session 69, SB2194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 12-60-24 of the North Dakota Century Code is
created and enacted as follows:
The bureau of criminal investigation shall accept digital fingerprints for a request for a
statewide criminal history record check and shall provide the results of a statewide
criminal history record check to the requesting agency, official, or entity, within four
business days from the day the bureau received authorization from the requesting
agency, official, or entity to conduct the statewide criminal history record check.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - ATTORNEY GENERAL - CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
CHECKS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $5,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to
the attorney general for the purpose of obtaining equipment and other costs associated with
criminal history record checks in accordance with section 1 of this Act, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. APPLICATION. Section 1 of this Act applies to a request for a statewide
criminal history record check received after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this Act becomes effective on February 1,
2026.
Page No. 1 25.0357.01000